lexica/verb_rules.lexc
LEXICON VProgInf

+V+Main+Progressive:+V VInfBase;

LEXICON VPerfInf

+V+Main+Perfective:+V VInfBase;

LEXICON VBiInf

+V+Main+Biaspectual:+V VInfBase;

LEXICON VInfBase

+Present+First+Sing:m #;
+Present+Second+Sing:š #;
+Present+Third+Sing: #;
+Present+First+Dual:va #;
+Present+Second+Dual:ta #;
+Present+Third+Dual:ta #;
+Present+First+Plural:mo #;
+Present+Second+Plural:te #;
+Present+Third+Plural:jo #;
+Imperative+Second+Sing:j #;
+Imperative+First+Dual:jva #;
+Imperative+Second+Dual:jta #;
+Imperative+First+Plural:jmo #;
+Imperative+Second+Plural:jte #;

+Infinite:ti #;
+Supine:t #;

+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Masc:l #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Masc:la #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Masc:li #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Fem:la #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Fem:li #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Fem:le #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Sing+Neut:lo #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Dual+Neut:li #;
+Participle+NoPerson+Plural+Neut:la #;



!LEXICON BitiInf
!;
